Hawaii statutes.
§101-54 Part I provisions adopted;
consolidation of proceedings. The provisions of part I are adopted for and
made applicable to the proceedings authorized by this part, except insofar as
the provisions of part I are inconsistent with the express provisions of this
part.

Upon motion of any party, any special
proceeding filed under this part may be consolidated for hearing and decision
with any proceeding brought under part I for the same public use, and if so
consolidated shall be heard and determined by the judge of the circuit court in
which the proceeding under part I is pending, sitting without a jury. [L 1949,
c 377, pt of §1; RL 1955, §8-53; HRS §101-54; am L 1973, c 30, pt of §5]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next